Utah statutes.
51-7-18.4.   Certified investment advisers' list -- Fees.

(1) (a)  The council shall provide a list of certified investment advisers to each public treasurer at least semiannually.

(b)  The list of certified investment advisers shall include:

(i)  the name of each certified investment adviser; and

(ii)  the name of each investment adviser representative authorized by the certified investment adviser to provide investment advisory services to public treasurers.

(2)  In addition to the requirements set forth by rule, in order to become a certified investment adviser as defined in Section 51-7-3, a certified investment adviser shall pay to the director an annual certification fee of $500 due on or before April 30 of each year.



Enacted by Chapter 248, 2004 General Session

